Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section and section 2  of this 2019 Act, “zero-emission
vehicle” means a battery electric vehicle,  a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle or a hydrogen fuel
cell vehicle or any  type of vehicle defined by the State Department of Energy or the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission by rule as a “zero-emission vehicle” if the vehicle’s type and
fuel are consistent with the goals set forth in this section.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Motor vehicle emissions contribute significantly to air pollution in this state.
(b) In 2019, the  Oregon transportation sector was responsible for approximately 40 per-
cent of this state’s greenhouse gas emissions, and light-duty vehicles were  responsible for
more than half of the transportation sector’s emissions.
(c) Motor vehicle emissions, especially greenhouse  gases, are difficult to reduce and will
rise over time if not limited by additional laws and regulations.
(d) Absent significant changes in the types of motor vehicles used by people and busi-
nesses in Oregon, the state will not meet the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals set
forth in ORS 468A.205.
(e) In ORS 757.357, the  Legislative Assembly found that transportation electrification is
necessary to reduce petroleum use, achieve optimum levels of energy efficiency  and carbon
reduction, meet federal and state  air quality standards, meet this state’s greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals set  forth in ORS 468A.205 and improve the public health and
safety.
(f) Existing federal and state incentives  and programs are insufficient to transform the
motor vehicle market on  a timeline that will protect Oregonians from the worst impacts of
global climate change.
(g) The purchase and ownership of zero-emission vehicles can reduce  the overall energy
costs paid by Oregon households and the specific costs associated with meeting  transporta-
tion needs.
(h) A  robust and well-operating market for zero-emission vehicles is essential to meeting
this state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 1
(i) Certain residents  and communities face greater barriers to purchasing or leasing
zero-emission vehicles, and additional support  and innovative solutions are necessary to en-
sure that all Oregon households benefit from transportation electrification.
(3) The Legislative Assembly declares the following goals:
(a) Transformation of the motor vehicle market must occur no later than 2035.
(b) Programs and support must be provided to accelerate Oregonians’ purchase and  use
of zero-emission vehicles until greenhouse gas emissions from vehicles are declining at a rate
consistent with this state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals set  forth in ORS
468A.205.
(c) The adoption  and use of zero-emission vehicles must be evaluated regularly to deter-
mine whether the rate of the adoption and use of zero-emission vehicles will put the state
on course to meet its greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals.
(4) To promote acquisition and use of  zero-emission vehicles, all entities of the executive
department, as defined in ORS 174.112, shall lead by example by:
(a) Purchasing or leasing light-duty or  medium-duty zero-emission vehicles, consistent
with ORS 283.327, when purchasing or leasing vehicles;
(b) Adopting policies and rules that promote the goals set forth in this section; and
(c) Considering recommendations submitted in the report required by section 2 of this
2019 Act that relate to zero-emission vehicles and adopting the recommendations when  fea-
sible.
SECTION 2.
(1) On or  before September 15 of each odd-numbered year, the State De-
partment of Energy shall submit to the Governor and an interim committee of  the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to the environment a report on  adoption of zero-emission vehicles in
this state and the progress the state is making to achieve reductions in  greenhouse gas
emissions in the transportation sector. The report shall provide:
(a) A review, using existing studies, market reports, polling data  or other publicly avail-
able information,  of the market in this state for zero-emission vehicles and any barriers to
adopting zero-emission vehicles in this state;
(b) An assessment  of the state’s progress in promoting the goals set forth in section 1
of this 2019 Act; and
(c) The date on which the state is predicted to meet the goals set  forth in section 1 of
this 2019 Act.
(2) The department may contract with third parties to assist in performing the  duties
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The  department shall assess the state’s progress under subsection (1)(b) of this sec-
tion. The assessment must focus on commercially  available, or near-commercially available,
zero-emission vehicle technology, to the extent possible, and rely on existing studies,  data
and analysis. In the assessment, the department shall evaluate:
(a) Whether the transportation sector is on course to reduce the share of greenhouse
gas emissions from  motor vehicles, as defined in ORS 801.360, consistent with the greenhouse
gas emissions reduction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205.
(b) The sales figures and  numbers of zero-emission vehicles that are owned in Oregon,
including forecasts as to whether:
(A) By 2020, 50,000 registered motor vehicles will be zero-emission vehicles;
(B) By 2025, at least 250,000 registered motor vehicles will be zero-emission vehicles;
(C) By 2030, at least 25  percent of registered motor vehicles, and at least 50 percent of
new motor vehicles sold annually, will be zero-emission vehicles; and
(D) By  2035, at least 90 percent of new motor vehicles sold annually will be zero-emission
vehicles.
(c) The sales figures and numbers  of zero-emission vehicles that are owned in Oregon,
differentiated, to the extent feasible, by demographic factors, including  whether persons that
own zero-emission vehicles reside in urban or rural areas.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 2
(d) The  availability and reliability of public and private electric vehicle charging
infrastructure that is  needed to support the targets for zero-emission vehicle sales and reg-
istration identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection. The department shall assess reliability
under this paragraph only if the department requests and obtains information on reliability
from providers of electric vehicle charging infrastructure.
(e) The incremental purchase cost difference, before and  after federal and state incen-
tives, between the purchase cost of a zero-emission vehicle and the purchase cost of a  com-
parable vehicle powered by an internal combustion engine.
(f) The zero-emission vehicles that are available for purchase in all market segments.
(g) Oregonians’ awareness of  motor vehicle options, the benefits of owning zero-emission
vehicles and the true costs of motor vehicle ownership.
(h) The carbon intensity of fuel consumed by the Oregon transportation  sector as a
whole.
(i) The general  progress toward electrification of all fossil fuel-based transportation
modes.
(j) Opportunities to  minimize impacts to the electric grid from transportation
electrification, including rate design, managed charging, vehicle-to-grid services and  elec-
tricity conservation techniques.
(k) In consultation with the Department  of Transportation, the impact of the sales and
ownership of zero-emission vehicles on  revenues that would otherwise accrue to the State
Highway Fund under ORS 366.505.
(4) If the State Department of Energy determines that the state  is not on course to meet
the goals set forth in section 1 of  this 2019 Act, the department shall make recommendations
in the report required by this  section, including recommendations for legislation. Recom-
mended legislation:
(a) May not mandate required levels of motor vehicle sales.
(b) Must promote the zero-emission vehicle market, address barriers  to adoption of
zero-emission vehicles in the light-duty portion of the transportation sector,  encourage
transportation electrification and further the goals set forth in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 283.327 is amended to read:
283.327. (1)(a) Unless a state agency finds that it is not feasible for a  zero-emission vehi-
cle, as defined in  section 1 of this 2019 Act, to meet the specific use for which a vehicle will
be purchased or leased, by 2025 the agency shall purchase or lease zero-emission vehicles for
at least 25 percent  of new state light-duty vehicle purchases and leases, to the extent zero-
emission vehicles are available.
(b) If the agency finds that  purchasing or leasing zero-emission vehicles is not feasible,
the agency may purchase or lease light-duty  vehicles that are capable of using alternative
fuel and that meet  the requirements established by the Comprehensive National Energy
Policy Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-486).
(c) If the agency finds that purchasing or leasing zero-emission vehicles  is not feasible
and that purchasing  or leasing light-duty vehicles that are capable of using alternative fuel
and that meet the requirements established by the Comprehensive National Energy Policy
Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-486) is not feasible, the agency may purchase  or lease vehicles that the
Department of Environmental Quality has identified by rule as low-emission vehicles.
[(1)] (2)  To  the maximum extent [ economically possible ] feasible , state-owned motor vehicles
shall be zero-emission vehicles or  use alternative fuel for operation.
[(2) State agencies shall acquire only motor vehicles capable of using  alternative fuel, except that
acquired vehicles assigned to areas unable economically to dispense alternative  fuel need not be so
configured.]
(3) Each agency owning motor vehicles shall comply with all safety  standards established by the
United States Department of Transportation in the conversion, operation and maintenance of vehi-
cles using alternative fuel.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 3
(4) To the maximum extent economically possible,  state-owned structures shall use biofuel, or
direct-application electricity generated from  biofuel, where diesel is currently utilized for stationary
or back-up generation.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Light-duty  vehicle” includes passenger cars, sedans, station wagons, pickup trucks
with a gross vehicle rating of 8,000 pounds or less, minivans  equipped for passengers or
cargo, sports utility vehicles, crossover  utility vehicles and specialty vehicles similar to ve-
hicles identified in this paragraph.
(b) “Light-duty vehicle” does not include police vehicles,  fire vehicles, trucks to which a
load-carrying device or container is not attached  or trucks that are equipped with a dump,
flatbed, tank, boom lift, crane or similar device.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 283.327, as amended by section 3 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
283.327. (1)(a) Unless a state agency finds that it is not feasible for a zero-emission vehicle, as
defined in section 1 of this 2019 Act, to meet the specific use for  which a vehicle will be purchased
or leased, [ by 2025 the agency shall purchase or lease zero-emission vehicles for at least 25 percent of
new state light-duty vehicle purchases and leases, to  the extent zero-emission vehicles are available. ]
the agency shall purchase or lease zero-emission vehicles  for all new state light-duty vehicle
purchases and leases.
(b) If the agency finds  that purchasing or leasing zero-emission vehicles is not feasible, the
agency may purchase or lease light-duty  vehicles that are capable of using alternative fuel and that
meet the  requirements established by the Comprehensive National Energy Policy Act of 1992 (P.L.
102-486).
(c) If the agency finds that purchasing or leasing zero-emission vehicles is not  feasible and that
purchasing or leasing light-duty vehicles that are capable  of using alternative fuel and that meet the
requirements established by the Comprehensive National Energy Policy Act  of 1992 (P.L. 102-486)
is not feasible, the agency may purchase  or lease vehicles that the Department of Environmental
Quality has identified by rule as low-emission vehicles.
(2) To the maximum extent feasible, state-owned motor vehicles shall be zero-emission vehicles
or use alternative fuel for operation.
(3) Each agency owning motor vehicles shall comply with all safety  standards established by the
United States Department of Transportation in the conversion, operation and maintenance of vehi-
cles using alternative fuel.
(4) To the maximum extent economically possible,  state-owned structures shall use biofuel, or
direct-application electricity generated from  biofuel, where diesel is currently utilized for stationary
or back-up generation.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Light-duty vehicle” includes passenger cars, sedans, station wagons, pickup trucks  with a
gross vehicle rating  of 8,000 pounds or less, minivans equipped for passengers or cargo, sports utility
vehicles, crossover utility vehicles and specialty vehicles similar to  vehicles identified in this para-
graph.
(b) “Light-duty vehicle” does not include police  vehicles, fire vehicles, trucks to which a load-
carrying device or container is  not attached or trucks that are equipped with a dump, flatbed, tank,
boom lift, crane or similar device.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 283.337 is amended to read:
283.337. (1) Prior  to December 31 of each year, each agency owning motor vehicles shall submit
an annual report to the Department of Environmental Quality and the  State Department of Energy.
The report shall contain at a minimum:
[(1)] (a) The number of vehicles acquired that are capable of using alternative fuel;
[(2)] (b) The number of vehicles converted from  the use of gasoline to the use of alternative fuel;
[(3)] (c)  The [ quantity] amount of each type of alternative fuel used  in the vehicles ; [ and]
(d) The number of zero-emission vehicles, as defined in section 1  of this 2019 Act, ac-
quired;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 4
(e) The amount of electricity used in the zero-emission vehicles; and
[(4)] (f)  Any other information required by the Department  of Environmental Quality and the
State Department of Energy.
(2) In the report, an agency that  purchases or leases a vehicle that is not a zero-emission
vehicle shall explain the reason for the purchase of an alternative fuel, hybrid  or low-
emission vehicle and demonstrate that purchasing or leasing a zero-emission vehicle was  not
feasible. To assess the feasibility of a  zero-emission vehicle under this subsection, an agency
may not consider any incremental  cost of a zero-emission vehicle over a comparable vehicle.
(3) For purposes  of the report, plug-in hybrid electric vehicles are not vehicles that are
capable of using alternative fuel.
SECTION 6.  ORS 283.343 is amended to read:
283.343. At least biennially, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall examine
compliance with rules adopted pursuant to ORS  283.340 by state agencies owning vehicles. The
department shall submit biennially to the Joint  Legislative Audit Committee a management report
on state-owned motor vehicles that includes:
(1) Summaries of agency compliance examinations, with  specific emphasis on noncomplying state
agency fleets;
(2) Numbers of motor vehicles, listed by model and by state agency;
(3) Mileage utilization of motor vehicles, listed by state agency;
(4) Operating cost per mile of motor vehicles, listed by state agency; and
(5) Recommendations for increasing motor vehicle utilization,  for decreasing the overall motor
vehicle population , for increasing the percentage of zero-emission vehicles within the motor
pool and agency fleets and for absorbing noncomplying state agency fleets into the motor pool.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
757.612. (1) There is  established an annual public purpose expenditure standard for electric
companies and Oregon Community Power to fund  new cost-effective energy conservation, new mar-
ket transformation efforts, the above-market costs of new renewable  energy resources and new
low-income weatherization. The public purpose  expenditure standard shall be funded by the public
purpose charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date  an electric company or Oregon Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to retail electricity  consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the electric company
or Oregon Community Power shall collect a  public purpose charge from all of the retail electricity
consumers located within the electric  company’s or Oregon Community Power’s service area until
January 1, 2026. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the public purpose charge
shall be  equal to three percent of the total revenues collected by the electric company, Oregon
Community Power or the electricity service supplier from retail electricity consumers for  electricity
services, distribution services, ancillary services, metering and billing, transition charges and other
types of costs included in electric rates on July 23, 1999.
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages more  than 100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, the electric company or Oregon Community Power,  whichever serves territory that abuts
the greatest percentage of the site of the aluminum plant,  shall collect from the aluminum company
a public purpose charge equal to  one percent of the total revenue from the sale of electricity ser-
vices to the aluminum plant from any source.
(3)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions  of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds collected  through public pur-
pose charges under subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Sixty-three percent for new cost-effective energy conservation and  new market transforma-
tion efforts.
(B) Nineteen percent for the above-market costs of constructing and operating  new renewable
energy resources with a nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300, of  20
megawatts or less.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 5
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Five percent for deposit in the Housing and Community Services Department  Electricity
Public Purpose  Charge Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) for the purpose of providing grants as
described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section  for an electric company or
Oregon Community Power shall  be paid out of the funds collected through public purpose charges.
The commission may require an electric company  or Oregon Community Power to direct funds col-
lected through public purpose charges to state agencies responsible for  implementing subsections (1)
to (6) of this section in order to pay the costs of administering subsections  (1) to (6) of this section.
(d) The commission shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are collected  and
spent by an electric company or Oregon  Community Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through competitive  bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds  dedicated for new low-income weatherization shall be di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department for purposes related to new  low-income
weatherization. The commission may also require funds  collected through public purpose charges to
be paid  to a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes described in subsection (1)
of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the  funds allocated for new
cost-effective energy conservation shall be spent within the service  area of the electric company;
or
(B) If Oregon Community Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the  funds allocated
for new cost-effective energy conservation shall be spent  within the service area of Oregon Com-
munity Power.
(e)(A) The first 10 percent of funds collected each year by  an electric company or Oregon
Community Power  under subsection (2) of this section shall be distributed to school districts that
are located in  the service territory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power. The funds
shall be distributed to individual school districts according to the weighted average daily  member-
ship (ADMw) of each school district  for the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS 327.013. The
commission shall establish by rule a  methodology for distributing a proportionate share of funds
under this paragraph  to school districts that are only partially located in the service territory of
the electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that  receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district  or for a fleet audit for the school
district. [A school district may not expend additional funds received under this  paragraph on a school
until an energy audit has been completed for that school. ] To  the extent practicable, a school district
shall coordinate with the State Department of Energy and incorporate federal  funding in complying
with this paragraph. Following completion of an [ energy] audit [ for an individual school ], the  school
district may expend funds received under this paragraph to implement the [ energy] audit.
(C) Once an energy audit has  been conducted and completely implemented for each school
within the school  district, the school district may expend funds received under this paragraph for
any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A  school district shall conduct an energy audit prior to
expending funds on any other purpose  authorized under this paragraph unless the school district has
performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) Weatherizing school district facilities and  upgrading the energy efficiency of school district
facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from environmentally focused sources.
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(D) Once a fleet audit has been  conducted for the school district, the school district may
expend funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 6
(i) Purchasing or leasing zero-emission vehicles, as  defined in section 1 of this 2019 Act,
including buses.
(ii) Purchasing or  installing electric vehicle charging stations to provide electricity to
zero-emission vehicles.
(f) The commission may not establish a different public purpose charge than the public  purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If  the commission requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be paid to a
nongovernmental entity, the entity shall:
(A) Include on the entity’s  board of directors an ex officio member designated by the commis-
sion, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Require the entity’s officers and directors to provide an annual disclosure of  economic in-
terest to be  filed with the commission on or prior to April 15 of each calendar year for public review
in a form similar to the  statement of economic interest required for public officials under ORS
244.060.
(C) Require the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts of interest
at regular meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise, and require an officer
or director to abstain from participating in any discussion or voting on any item  where that officer
or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the purposes of this  subparagraph, “actual conflict
of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have the meanings  given those terms in ORS 244.020.
(D) Annually, arrange for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s financial statements,  and
direct the auditor to file an audit opinion with the commission for public review.
(E) Annually file with the commission the entity’s budget,  action plan and quarterly and annual
reports for public review.
(F) At least  once every five years, contract for an independent management evaluation to review
the entity’s operations, efficiency and effectiveness, and direct the independent reviewer  to file a
report with the commission for public review.
(h) The commission may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity an  of-
ficer or director who fails to provide  an annual disclosure of economic interest, or who fails to de-
clare an actual or potential conflict  of interest, as described in paragraph (g)(B) and (C) of this
subsection, if the failure is connected to the allocation or  expenditure of funds collected through
public purpose charges and paid to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section:
(A) Has no  further obligation to invest in new cost-effective energy conservation, new market
transformation or new  low-income weatherization, or to provide a commercial energy conservation
services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power,  for any period during which Oregon Community Power collects
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) Has no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective energy conservation,  new market
transformation or new low-income weatherization, or to provide a commercial  energy conservation
services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer that uses  more than one average megawatt of electricity at
any site in the prior year shall receive a  credit against public purpose charges billed by an electric
company or Oregon Community Power for that site. The amount of the credit shall  be equal to the
total amount of qualifying expenditures for  new cost-effective energy conservation, not to exceed 68
percent of the annual public purpose charges, and the above-market costs of new renewable energy
resources incurred by the retail electricity consumer, not to exceed  19 percent of the annual public
purpose charges, less administration costs incurred  under this paragraph and paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this subsection. The credit may not exceed, on an annual basis, the lesser of:
(A) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 7
(B) The  portion of the public purpose charge billed to the retail electricity consumer that is
dedicated to new cost-effective energy conservation,  new market transformation or the above-market
costs of new renewable energy resources.
(b) To obtain a credit under paragraph (a) of this subsection,  a retail electricity consumer shall
file with the State Department of Energy a description of  the proposed conservation project or new
renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity  consumer plans to incur the
qualifying expenditure. The State Department of Energy shall issue a  notice of precertification
within 30  days of receipt of the filing, if such filing is consistent with paragraph (a) of this sub-
section. The credit may be  taken after a retail electricity consumer provides a letter from a certified
public accountant to the State Department of Energy verifying that  the precertified qualifying ex-
penditure has been made.
(c) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer as  a result of qualifying expenditures that
are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
(d)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt of  electricity at
any site in the prior year may request that the  State Department of Energy hire an independent
auditor to assess the potential for conservation investments at the site. If  the independent auditor
determines there  is no available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback
of one to 10 years, the retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent of its  payment
obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the  independent auditor determines that
there are potential conservation measures  available at the site, the retail electricity consumer shall
be entitled to a credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to 54 percent  of the
public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A retail electricity consumer shall be entitled each year to the credit described in this par-
agraph unless a subsequent independent audit determines that new conservation investment oppor-
tunities are available. The State Department of  Energy may require that a new independent audit
be performed on the site to  determine whether new conservation measures are available, provided
that the independent audits occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent  audits described in this
paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers shall  receive a fair and reasonable credit
for the public purpose expenditures  of their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the method by which such credits are  accounted
for and used. The State Department of Energy also shall adopt methods to account for eligible public
purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose  charge provided under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power shall  collect funds for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the  amount to be collected by each electric company from
retail electricity consumers, and the rates to be charged by  each electric company to retail elec-
tricity consumers, so that the forecasted collection by  all electric companies in calendar year 2018
is $20 million. In subsequent calendar years, the commission may  not decrease the rates below those
established for calendar year 2018.  The commission may temporarily adjust the rates if forecasted
collections or actual collections are less than $20 million  in any calendar year. A retail electricity
consumer may not be required to pay more than $500 per month per site for low-income electric bill
payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected through the low-income electric bill payment assistance charge shall be paid
into the Housing and Community Services Department  Low-Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance
Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2). Moneys deposited in the fund under this paragraph  shall be
used by the Housing and Community Services Department  solely for purposes related to low-income
electric bill payment assistance and for the Housing and Community  Services Department’s cost of
administering this subsection. Funds collected by an electric company  or Oregon Community Power
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 8
under this subsection shall be  expended in the service area of the electric company or Oregon
Community Power from which the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  determine the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be  allocated by the Housing and Community Services
Department to energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income bill
payment and crisis assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services Department,  in consultation with electric companies,
shall investigate and may implement alternative delivery models to  effectively reduce service dis-
connections and related costs to retail electricity consumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall be directed to low-income electricity consumers who are  in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services Department shall maintain  records and provide those
records upon request to an electric company, Oregon Community Power and the  Citizens’ Utility
Board established  under ORS chapter 774 on a quarterly basis. Records maintained must include
the numbers of low-income electricity consumers served, the average  amounts paid to low-income
electricity  consumers  and the type of assistance provided to low-income electricity consumers.
Electric companies and  Oregon Community Power shall, if requested, provide the Housing and
Community Services Department  with aggregate data relating to low-income electricity consumers
served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited  in the Housing and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may be  used to pro-
vide bill payment and  crisis assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of heat is not
electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company  or Oregon
Community Power to provide reduced rates or  other bill payment or crisis assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low  Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For purposes  of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service in-
dustrial consumer that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the elec-
tric utility.
(9) For  purposes of this section, funds collected by Oregon Community Power through public
purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 8.
The amendments to ORS 283.327 by  section 4 of this 2019 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2029.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 9
Passed by Senate June 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-A) Page 10